Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-829
Violations; penalty.

If a bank violates any provision of sections 8-820 to 8-823 in making or collecting any loan made under section 8-820, no charges of any kind shall be collected on such loan. If any charges have been collected, the bank shall forfeit to the borrower all interest collected on the loan involved and a sum equal thereto. The bank so offending shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1965, c. 31, § 15, p. 219;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 62.